Utah statutes.
48-2a-105.   Records to be kept.

Each limited partnership shall keep at its principal place of business, as specified in the certificate of limited partnership required by Section 48-2a-201, the following:

(1)  a current list in alphabetical order of the full name and last known business address of each partner, separately identifying the general partners and the limited partners;

(2)  a copy of the certificate of limited partnership and all certificates of amendment thereto, together with the executed copies of any powers of attorney pursuant to which the certificate has been executed;

(3)  copies of the limited partnership's federal, state, and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the three most recent years;

(4)  copies of any then effective written limited partnership agreements and of any financial statements of the limited partnership for the three most recent years; and

(5)  unless contained in a written partnership agreement, a writing setting out:

(a)  the amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of the other property or services contributed by each partner and which each partner has agreed to contribute;

(b)  the times at which or events on the happening of which any additional contributions agreed to be made by each partner are to be made;

(c)  any right of a partner to receive, or of a general partner to make, distributions to a partner which include a return of all or any of the partner's contribution; and

(d)  any events upon the happening of which the limited partnership is to be dissolved and its affairs wound up.

